Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-3303
Computer science and technology education, defined.

For purposes of the Computer Science and Technology Education Act, computer science and technology education includes, but is not limited to, knowledge and skills regarding computer literacy, educational technology, digital citizenship, information technology, and computer science.

Laws 2022, LB1112, § 3.
July 21, 2022